North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 49E. Disposal of Dead Diseased Poultry at Commercial Farms.

§ 106-549.70.
Disposal pit, incinerator, or poultry composting facility required.

Every person, firm or corporation engaged in raising or producing poultry for commercial purposes shall provide and maintain a disposal pit, incinerator, or poultry composting facility of a size and design, approved by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, in which all dead poultry carcasses are disposed. This section does not apply to poultry producers with flocks of 200 or less. The definitions provided in Article 49D of this Chapter apply in this Article.

History.

1961, c. 1197, s. 1; 1995, c. 543, s. 2; 1997-261, s. 109.

§ 106-549.71.
Penalty for violation.

Any person, firm or corporation violating the provisions of this Article is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1961, c. 1197, s. 2; 1999-408, s. 8.

§ 106-549.72.
Civil penalties.

The Commissioner may assess a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) against any person who violates a provision of this Article or any rule promulgated thereunder. In determining the amount of the penalty, the Commissioner shall consider the degree and extent of harm caused by the violation.

The clear proceeds of civil penalties assessed pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

History.

1995, c. 516, s. 13; 1998-215, s. 18.

§§ 106-549.73 through 106-549.80.

Reserved for future codification purposes.